Hawaii statutes.
[§23G-4] Prohibitions. Neither the
director nor any employee of the bureau shall reveal to any person outside of
the bureau the contents of matters of any request or statement for services
except upon request of the person making the request or statement. [L 1972, c
171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next